Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-3204
Eligible postsecondary educational institutions; duties; awards; prohibited acts.

(1) Eligible postsecondary educational institutions, acting as agents of the commission, shall:

(a) Receive and process applications for awards under the Door to College Scholarship Act;

(b) Determine eligibility of students based on criteria set forth in the act; and

(c) No later than the application deadline set by the commission, make recommendations to the commission for awards to eligible students, including the name and social security number of each eligible student.

(2) An award under the Door to College Scholarship Act shall not be used by a postsecondary educational institution to reduce institutional scholarships, grants, or tuition or fee waivers that a student would otherwise be eligible to receive if such student did not receive an award under the act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 31.